Utah statutes.
78B-14-203 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Initiating and responding tribunal of state.

Under this chapter, a tribunal of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to another state and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

